South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-510 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding a subsection to read: (D) Notwithstanding subsections (A) and (B), for taxable years beginning after 2024, a tax is imposed on the South Carolina taxable income of individuals, estates, and trusts and any other entity except those taxed or exempted from taxation under Sections 12-6-530 through 12-6-550 computed at the following rates with the income brackets indexed in accordance with Section 12-6-520: 25 At least But not less than Compute the tax as follows 26 $0 $1,000,000 0% times the amount 27 28 $1,000,000 or more 6% times the amount over $1,000,000 SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----